Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1707
Sheriff's sales; purchases prohibited.

No sheriff or his deputy or constable shall become the purchaser, either directly or indirectly, of any property by him exposed to sale under any process of law or equity; and every such purchase is absolutely void.

Laws 1879, § 122, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 5659;

C.S.1922, § 4986;

C.S.1929, § 26-1407;

R.S.1943, § 23-1707.